zh-TW: 水龍頭螺紋: 雙重; 女性; 男性; 其他
hr-HR: Navoj na slavini: Dvojni; Ženski; Muški; Ostalo
th: เธรดก๊อกน้ำ: คู่; หญิง; ชาย; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Adaptador para torneira: Duplo; Feminino; Masculino; Outro
bg-BG: Резба за кран: Двойно; Женски; Мъжки; Други
pl: Gwint kranu: Dual; Kobieta; Mężczyzna; Inne
sv: Krangänga: Dubbel; Dam; Herr; Övrigt
fi: Hanan kierre: Kaksiosainen; Naiset; Miehet; Muu
de: Wasserhahngewinde: Zwei; Weiblich; Männlich; Sonstiges
ru: Резьба смесителя: Двойной; Внешний; Внутренний; Другой
hu: Csaptelep menete: Kettős; Anya; Apa; Egyéb
en: Faucet thread: Dual; Female; Male; Other
pt-BR: Rosca da torneira: Dual; Feminino; Masculino; Outro
cs: Závit kohoutku: Duální; Ženy; Muži; Jiné
tr: Musluk İpliği: Çift; Kadın; Erkek; Diğer
nl: Kraandraad: Dubbel; Vrouwelijk; Mannelijk; Andere
es: Rosca del grifo: Doble; Femenino; Masculino; Otros
da: Vandhanegevind: Dobbelt; Kvinde; Mand; Andet
vi: Đầu nối vòi nước: Hai nhiệt độ; Nữ giới; Nam giới; Khác
fr: Filetage du robinet: Double; Féminin; Masculin; Autre
ko: 수도꼭지 스레드: 듀얼; 여성; 남성; 기타
el: Σπείρωμα της βρύσης: Διπλός; Γυναικείο; Ανδρικό; Άλλο
lt-LT: Čiaupo sriegis: Dviguba; Lizdinė; Kištukinė; Kita
it: Filo del rubinetto: Doppie; Femmina; Maschio; Altro
ja: 蛇口のネジ: デュアル; 女性; 男性; その他
ro-RO: Filet robinet: Dublu; Mamă; Tată; Altele
sk-SK: Kohútikový závit: Dvojitý; Vnútorný; Vonkajší; Iné
sl-SI: Navoj za pipo: Dvojno; Ženski; Moški; Drugo
nb: Krangjenger: Dobbel; Dame; Mann; Annet
zh-CN: 水龙头螺纹: 双温区; 女性; 男性; 其他